Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 6721XS (5) 91 sb/js S.F. 2377 Section 1. Section 455B.174, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. In accordance with the federal Safe 3 Drinking Water Act as defined in section 455B.291, post on the 4 departmentâs internet site drinking water data accessible to 5 the public in a searchable, user-friendly database that allows 6 a person to search water sample data in this state at least by 7 specific contaminant type, location, and public water supply 8 system, and that allows for the filtering of water sample data 9 by the date in which the water sampling occurred. The water 10 sample data shall include the level of each tested possible 11 contaminant, including nitrates, for all water sampling done by 12 a public water supply system. The departmentâs internet site 13 shall be in compliance with this subsection no later than six 14 months after the effective date of this Act. 15